src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_CÕGGI !!= * @CODE@ cõggi:cõggi
! gradation: yes
! is for nouns with ''-est'' +Loc
!! ** Yaml: __N-joovvi__
!! * There are several stem types
!! * cõggi:cõggi
!! NumContLex="1.2"
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! cõggi
: SG-NOM ;	       		! cõggi
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;			! cõggi
:%^I2J%>a SG-ILL ;		! cõggja
:%^I2J%>e SG-LOC ;		! cõggjest
:%^I2J SG-COM_IN ;		! cõggjin
:%^I2J%>e ESS/PAR ;  		! cõggjen
:%^V2VV PL-NOM ;		! cõõggi
:%^I2J PL-OBL ;		! cõggi
+Use/NG: PL-NOM ;		! cõggi
+Use/NG:%^V2VV%^I2J PL-OBL ;		! cõõggi

!! participles in -I from verbs in -âd
LEXICON NOM-AG_ÂD
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;		! suõskki
: SG-NOM ;	       			! suõskki
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	! 
:%^I2J%>a SG-ILL ;    		! suõskkja
:%^I2J%>e SG-LOC ;
:%^I2J SG-COM_IN ;
:%^I2J%>e ESS/PAR ; ! ess and prt without
+Use/NG: PL-NOM ;				! suõskki
:%^I2J PL-OBL ;			! suõskkji
LEXICON NOM-AG_ÂD_NO-PL-NOM
: PL-NOM ;				! suõski
+Use/NG:%^I2J PL-OBL ;	! suõskji


LEXICON N_JÕÕVVI !!= * @CODE@ jõõvvi:jõõvvi
+N: NMN_JÕÕVVI ;
LEXICON NMN_JÕÕVVI !!= * @CODE@ jõõvvi:jõõvvi
! gradation: yes
! is for nouns with ''-est'' +Loc
!! ** Yaml: __N-joovvi__
!! * There are several stem types
!! * jõõvvi:jõõvvi
!! NumContLex="1.2"
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	!!= * @CODE@ (1) jõõvvi
: SG-NOM ;	       		!!= * @CODE@ (1) jõõvvi
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		!!= * @CODE@ (2) jõõvvi
:%^I2J%>a SG-ILL ;		!!= * @CODE@ jõõvvja
:%^I2J%>e SG-LOC ;		!!= * @CODE@ jõõvvjest
:%^I2J SG-COM_IN ;		!!= * @CODE@ jõõvvjin
:%^I2J%>e ESS/PAR ;  		!!= * @CODE@ jõõvvjen
:%^CC2C PL-NOM ;		!!= * @CODE@ jõõvi
:%^I2J PL-OBL ;		!!= * @CODE@ jõõvvi
+Use/NG:%^CC2C%^I2J PL-OBL ;	!!= * @CODE@ jõõvi
+Use/NG: PL-NOM ;		!!= * @CODE@ jõõvvi

LEXICON N_LOOKKI !!= * @CODE@ lookki:lookki
+N: NMN_LOOKKI ;
LEXICON NMN_LOOKKI !!= * @CODE@ lookki:lookki
! gradation: yes
! is for nouns with ''-est'' +Loc
!! ** Yaml: __lookk__
!! * There are several stem types
!! * lookki:lookki
!! NumContLex="1.2"
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! lookki
: SG-NOM ;	       		! lookki
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		! lookki
:%^I2J%>a SG-ILL ;		! lookkja
:%^I2J%>e SG-LOC ;		! lookkjest
:%^I2J SG-COM_IN ;		! lookkjin
:%^I2J%>e ESS/PAR ;   		! lookkjen
:%^KK2GG PL-NOM ;		! looǥǥi
:%^I2J PL-OBL ;		! lookkji
+Use/NG: PL-NOM ;		! lookki
+Use/NG:%^KK2GG%^I2J PL-OBL ;		! looǥǥji


LEXICON N_TOBDDI !!= * @CODE@ tobddi:tobddi
+N: NMN_TOBDDI ;
LEXICON NMN_TOBDDI !!= * @CODE@ tobddi:tobddi
! gradation: yes
! is for nouns with ''-est'' +Loc
!! ** Yaml: __N-kjiolddi__
!! * There are several stem types
!! * sirddi:sirddi
!! NumContLex="1.2"
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! tobddi
: SG-NOM ;	       		! tobddi
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;    		! tobddi
: SG-ACC ;    		! tobddi
:%^I2J%>a SG-ILL ;		! tobddja
:%^I2J%>e SG-LOC ;		! tobddjest
:%^I2J SG-COM_N ;		! tobddjin
:%^I2J%>e ESS/PAR ;  		! tobddjen
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY PL-NOM ;             ! toobdi
+Use/NG: PL-NOM ;             ! tobddi
:%^I2J PL-OBL ;             	! tobddji
+Use/NG: PL-NOM ;      ! tobddi
+Use/NG:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%^I2J PL-OBL ;      ! toobdji

LEXICON N_ǨIÕSSI !!= * @CODE@ ǩiõssi:ǩiõssi
+N: NMN_ǨIÕSSI ;
LEXICON NMN_ǨIÕSSI !!= * @CODE@ ǩiõssi:ǩiõssi
! gradation: yes
! is for nouns with ''-est'' +Loc
!! ** Yaml: __N-joovvi__
!! * There are several stem types
!! * sirddi:sirddi
!! NumContLex="1.2"
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;	! ǩiõssi
: SG-NOM ;	       		! ǩiõssi
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;    		! ǩiõssi
:%^I2J%>a SG-ILL ;		! ǩiõssja
:%^I2J%>e SG-LOC ;		! ǩiõssjest
:%^I2J SG-COM_IN ;		! ǩiõssjin
:%^I2J%>e ESS/PAR ;  		! ǩiõssjen
:%^KK2GG PL-NOM ;             ! ǩiõzzi
+Use/NG: PL-NOM ;             ! ǩiõssi
:%^I2J PL-OBL ;             	! ǩiõssji
+Use/NG: PL-NOM ;      	! ǩiõssi
+Use/NG:%^KK2GG%^I2J PL-OBL ;      ! ǩiõzzji

LEXICON N_VUÕLLI !!= * @CODE@ vuõlli:vuõlli
+N: NMN_VUÕLLI ;
LEXICON NMN_VUÕLLI !!= * @CODE@ vuõlli:vuõlli
! gradation: yes
! is for nouns with ''-est'' +Loc
!! ** Yaml: __N-vuolli__
!! * There are several stem types
!! * vuõlli:vuõlli
!! NumContLex="1.2"
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
: SG-NOM ;
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:%^I2J%>a SG-ILL ;
:%^I2J%>e SG-LOC ;
:%^I2J SG-COM_IN ;
:%^I2J%>e ESS/PAR ; ! ess and prt without
:%^CC2C PL-NOM ;
:%^I2J PL-OBL ;


LEXICON N_SUÕSKKI !!= * @CODE@ suõskki:suõskki
+N: NMN_SUÕSKKI ;
LEXICON NMN_SUÕSKKI !!= * @CODE@ suõskki:suõskki
! is for nouns with ''-est'' +Loc
! gradation: yes
!! ** Yaml: __suoskki__

: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;		! suõskki
: SG-NOM ;	       			! suõskki
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	! 
:%^I2J%>a SG-ILL ;    		! suõskkja
:%^I2J%>e SG-LOC ;
:%^I2J SG-COM_IN ;
:%^I2J%>e ESS/PAR ; ! ess and prt without
+Use/NG: PL-NOM ;				! suõskki
:%^I2J PL-OBL ;			! suõskkji
:%^Pen%^XYY2XY PL-NOM ;				! suõski
+Use/NG:%^Pen%^XYY2XY%^I2J PL-OBL ;	! suõskji

!! participles in -AI from verbs in -ad
LEXICON  NOM-AG_AD
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; !!= * @CODE@
: SG-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^RmVow%^I2J%>a SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^RmVow%^I2J%>e SG-LOC ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^RmVow%^I2J SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^I2J%>e ESS/PAR ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^RmVow%^I2J PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@
+Use/NG: PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@
LEXICON  NOM-AG_AD_NO-PL-NOM
: PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@
+Use/NG:%^RmVow%^I2J PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@


LEXICON N_KÅČČAI !!= * @CODE@ kåččai:kåččai
+N: NMN_KÅČČAI ;
LEXICON NMN_KÅČČAI !!= * @CODE@ kåččai:kåččai
! gradation: yes
!! ** Yaml: __kachchai__
!! * There are several stem types
!! * 
!! NumContLex="
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; !!= * @CODE@
: SG-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^RmVow%^I2J%>a SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^RmVow%^I2J%>e SG-LOC ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^RmVow%^V2VV SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^I2J%>e ESS/PAR ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^Pen%^V2VV PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^RmVow%^I2J PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@
+Use/NG: PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@
+Use/NG:%^Pen%^V2VV%^RmVow%^I2J PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@

LEXICON N_PEELLAI !!= * @CODE@ peellai:peellai
+N: NMN_PEELLAI ;
LEXICON NMN_PEELLAI !!= * @CODE@ peellai:peellai
! gradation: yes
!! ** Yaml: __paassai__
!! * There are several stem types
!! * 
!! NumContLex="
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; !!= * @CODE@
: SG-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ Sg.Nom.Indef: peellai 
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^RmVow%^I2J%>a SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@ Sg.Ill.Indef: peellja
:%^RmVow%^I2J%>e SG-LOC ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^RmVow%^V2VV SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^I2J%>e ESS/PAR ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^Pen%^CC2C PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ Pl.Nom.Indef: peelai
:%^RmVow%^I2J PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@
+Use/NG: PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@
+Use/NG:%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow%^I2J PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@

LEXICON N_PÅÅSSAI !!= * @CODE@ pååssai:pååssai
+N: NMN_PÅÅSSAI ;
LEXICON NMN_PÅÅSSAI !!= * @CODE@ pååssai:pååssai
! gradation: yes
!! ** Yaml: __paassai__
!! * There are several stem types
!! * 
!! NumContLex="
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; !!= * @CODE@
: SG-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ Sg.Nom.Indef: pååssai 
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^RmVow%^I2J%>a SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@ Sg.Ill.Indef: pååssja
:%^RmVow%^I2J%>e SG-LOC ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^RmVow%^I2J SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^I2J%>e ESS/PAR ; !!= * @CODE@
:%^Pen%^KK2GG PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ Pl.Nom.Indef: pååzzai
:%^RmVow%^I2J PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@
+Use/NG: PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@
+Use/NG:%^Pen%^KK2GG%^RmVow%^I2J PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@

LEXICON N_SÄRNNAI !!= * @CODE@ särnnai:särnnai
+N: NMN_SÄRNNAI ;
LEXICON NMN_SÄRNNAI !!= * @CODE@ särnnai:särnnai
! is for nouns with ''-est'' +Loc
! gradation: yes
!! ** Yaml: __sarnnai__
!! * There are several stem types
!! * särnnai:särnnai
!! NumContLex="
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
: SG-NOM ;
:%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^XYY2XY SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:%^RmVow%^I2J%>a SG-ILL ;
:%^RmVow%^I2J%>e SG-LOC ;
:%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^XYY2XY%^RmVow%^I2J SG-COM_IN ;
:%^RmVow%^I2J%>e ESS/PAR ; ! ess and prt without
:%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^XYY2XY SG-ABE ;
:%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^XYY2XY PL-NOM ;
:%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^XYY2XY%^RmVow%^I2J%>i PL-OBL ;


LEXICON N_VUEJJAI !!= * @CODE@ vuejjai:vuejjai
+N: NMN_VUEJJAI ;
