src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-INCOMING
baleʹttsiõrri:baleʹttsiõrri N_VUÕLLI ;
bussvuejjai:bussvuejjai N_VUEJJAI ;
counni:co%^1VOWunni N_TOBDDI ;
cõõggõõtti:cõõggõõtti N_JÕÕVVI ;
dommpuõccihåiddai:dommpuõccihåiddai N_SÄRNNAI ;
dåhttrõõšši:dåhttrõõšši N_LOOKKI ;
hauddi:ha%^1VOWuddi N_TOBDDI ;
haukki:ha%^1VOWukki N_TOBDDI ;
jaukki:ja%^1VOWukki N_TOBDDI ;
jeälõõtti:jeälõõtti N_JÕÕVVI ;
joossai:joossai N_PÅÅSSAI ;
juukki:juukki N_LOOKKI ;
jõskki:jõ%^1VOWskki N_TOBDDI ;
kaammikuärrai:kaammi#kuärrai N_VUEJJAI ;
karssi:ka%^1VOWrssi N_TOBDDI ;
kastti:ka%^1VOWstti N_TOBDDI ;
kaunni:ka%^1VOWunni N_TOBDDI ;
kaupp-priimmi:kaupp-priimmi N_JÕÕVVI ;
kiõrddi:kiõrddi N_SUÕSKKI ;
kookki:kookki N_LOOKKI ;
kopčči:ko%^1VOWpčči N_TOBDDI ;
kuuʹsǩinsiõrri:kuuʹsǩinsiõrri N_VUÕLLI ;
kuârsmõõvvi:kuârsmõõvvi N_JÕÕVVI ;
kuõbbrõõšši:kuõbbrõõšši N_LOOKKI ;
kuõrri:kuõrri N_VUÕLLI ;
käiggai:käiggai N_SÄRNNAI ;
kärddai:kärddai N_SÄRNNAI ;
käärabneävvai:käärab#neävvai N_VUEJJAI ;
kåccstõõlli:kåccstõõlli N_JÕÕVVI ;
kåččai:kå%^1VOWččai N_KÅČČAI ;
kõõčči:kõõčči N_LOOKKI ;
kõõǩǩi:kõõǩǩi N_LOOKKI ;
lauggi:la%^1VOWuggi N_TOBDDI ;
luõmmi:luõmmi N_VUÕLLI ;
läinnvuäǯǯai:läinn#vuäǯǯai N_VUEJJAI ;
läittai:läittai N_SÄRNNAI ;
läʹškkstõõlli:läʹškkstõõlli N_JÕÕVVI ;
miinnoocci:miinnoocci N_LOOKKI ;
miârrčuõvvi:miârrčuõvvi N_VUÕLLI ;
muâlkkrõõšši:muâlkkrõõšši N_LOOKKI ;
mõõnni:mõõnni N_JÕÕVVI ;
neessai:neessai N_PÅÅSSAI ;
neävvai:neävvai N_VUEJJAI ;
neʹttlookki:neʹttlookki N_LOOKKI ;
njaukki:nja%^1VOWukki N_TOBDDI ;
njiõʒʒi:njiõʒʒi N_VUÕLLI ;
njorggai:njorggai N_SÄRNNAI ;
njuällai:njuällai N_VUEJJAI ;
njuämmai:njuämmai N_VUEJJAI ;
norddai:norddai N_SÄRNNAI ;
näggrõõšši:näggrõõšši N_LOOKKI ;
näuddai:näuddai N_SÄRNNAI ;
oiggai:oiggai N_SÄRNNAI ;
oocci:oocci N_LOOKKI ;
ouddõõtti:ouddõõtti N_JÕÕVVI ;
oudldõstti:oudldõ%^1VOWstti N_TOBDDI ;
ođđaassi:ođđaassi N_LOOKKI ;
peellai:peellai N_PEELLAI ;
peiggõõšši:peiggõõšši N_LOOKKI ;
pelkkai:pelkkai N_SÄRNNAI ;
peälštõõvvi:peälštõõvvi N_JÕÕVVI ;
pokkjõõtti:pokkjõõtti N_JÕÕVVI ;
pookki:pookki N_LOOKKI ;
proŋkkai:proŋkkai N_SÄRNNAI ;
puäʒʒoocci:puäʒʒoocci N_LOOKKI ;
pââččai:pââččai N_PÅÅSSAI ;
pââččai:pââččai N_PÅÅSSAI ;
päkkai:pä%^1VOWkkai N_KÅČČAI ;
päällainsiõrri:päällainsiõrri N_VUÕLLI ;
päärhååʹdneävvai:päärhååʹd#neävvai N_VUEJJAI ;
pååssai:pååssai N_PÅÅSSAI ;
põõssi:põõssi N_LOOKKI ;
raanni:raanni N_JÕÕVVI ;
reiddai:reiddai N_SÄRNNAI ;
ristti:ri%^1VOWstti N_TOBDDI ;
ruuhhisiõrri:ruuhhisiõrri N_VUÕLLI ;
ruõjji:ruõjji N_VUÕLLI ;
rääkkai:rääkkai N_PÅÅSSAI ;
räʹjjtõõlli:räʹjjtõõlli N_JÕÕVVI ;
rååkkai:rååkkai N_PÅÅSSAI ;
rååttai:rååttai N_PEELLAI ;
sekkai:se%^1VOWkkai N_KÅČČAI ;
seullai:seullai N_SÄRNNAI ;
seâllai:seâllai N_VUEJJAI ;
seâllai:seâllai N_VUEJJAI ;
seävvai:seävvai N_VUEJJAI ;
siõrri:siõrri N_VUÕLLI ;
speâllai:speâllai N_VUEJJAI ;
spraavdõõtti:spraavdõõtti N_JÕÕVVI ;
suudkåččai:suudkå%^1VOWččai N_KÅČČAI ;
suukki:suukki N_LOOKKI ;
suõskki:suõskki N_SUÕSKKI ;
sââjjai:sââjjai N_PEELLAI ;
sälvvai:sälvvai N_SÄRNNAI ;
sǩiõlddõõtti:sǩiõlddõõtti N_JÕÕVVI ;
taibbi:ta%^1VOWibbi N_TOBDDI ;
tancci:ta%^1VOWncci N_TOBDDI ;
tiânnai:tiânnai N_VUEJJAI ;
torkki:to%^1VOWrkki N_TOBDDI ;
toullai:toullai N_SÄRNNAI ;
tuužži:tuužži N_JÕÕVVI ;
tuâjjoocci:tuâjjoocci N_LOOKKI ;
tuärrai:tuärrai N_VUEJJAI ;
tuõlmmi:tuõlmmi N_SUÕSKKI ;
tuõlmmi:tuõlmmi N_SUÕSKKI ;
tuõrri:tuõrri N_VUÕLLI ;
tuõrvvi:tuõrvvi N_SUÕSKKI ;
tuõšmmi:tuõšmmi N_SUÕSKKI ;
tääjjai:tääjjai N_PEELLAI ;
tääjjai:tääjjai N_PEELLAI ;
tääkkai:tääkkai N_PÅÅSSAI ;
täävvai:täävvai N_PEELLAI ;
tårmmai:tårmmai N_SÄRNNAI ;
valvvi:va%^1VOWlvvi N_TOBDDI ;
veänccõõtti:veänccõõtti N_JÕÕVVI ;
virkkai:virkkai N_SÄRNNAI ;
vuejjai:vuejjai N_VUEJJAI ;
vuällai:vuällai N_VUEJJAI ;
vuåkkõõvvi:vuåkkõõvvi N_JÕÕVVI ;
vuõggǩiõssi:vuõggǩiõssi N_ǨIÕSSI ;
vuõjji:vuõjji N_VUÕLLI ;
vuõlli:vuõlli N_VUÕLLI ;
vuõʹrri:vuõʹrri N_VUÕLLI ;
vââđđai:vââđđai N_PEELLAI ;
västtai:västtai N_SÄRNNAI ;
väällai:väällai N_PEELLAI ;
äinnai:äinnai N_VUEJJAI ;
ärjstõõlli:ärjstõõlli N_JÕÕVVI ;
äʹššvuejjai:äʹššvuejjai N_VUEJJAI ;
õõmtõõšši:õõmtõõšši N_LOOKKI ;
čaʹppeskolmmai:čaʹppeskolmmai N_SÄRNNAI ;
čouggi:čo%^1VOWuggi N_TOBDDI ;
čuõlli:čuõlli N_VUÕLLI ;
čâʹlmmluõmmi:čâʹlmmluõmmi N_VUÕLLI ;
čårstõõtti:čårstõõtti N_JÕÕVVI ;
čååkkai:čååkkai N_PÅÅSSAI ;
špeiggai:špeiggai N_SÄRNNAI ;
šååkkai:šååkkai N_PÅÅSSAI ;
ǩiõlläʹšštobddi:ǩiõlläʹššto%^1VOWbddi N_TOBDDI ;
